Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 5. General Partners

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1292 to 1298, 1302 to 1343.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 422 to 427, 430.

§ 17-14-501.
Admission of additional general partners.

After the filing of a limited partnership’s original certificate of limited partnership, additional general partners may be admitted as provided in writing in the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not provide in writing for the admission of additional general partners, with the written consent of all partners.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Limited partnership: sufficiency of procedure for designating or admitting additional general partner, 6 ALR4th 1277.

§ 17-14-502.
Events of withdrawal.

Except as approved by the specific written consent of all partners at the time, a person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership upon the happening of any of the following events:

The general partner withdraws from the limited partnership as provided in W.S.

17-14-702

;

The general partner ceases to be a member of the limited partnership as provided in W.S.

17-14-802

;

The general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, the general partner:

Makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

Is adjudicated as bankrupt or insolvent;

Files a petition or answer seeking for himself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law or regulation;

Files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against him in any proceeding of this nature; or

Seeks, consents to or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his properties.

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, one hundred twenty (120) days after the commencement of any proceeding against the general partner seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within ninety (90) days after the appointment without his consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed or within ninety (90) days after the expiration of any such stay, the appointment is not vacated;

In the case of a general partner who is a natural person:

His death; or

The entry by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating him incompetent to manage his person or his estate.

In the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust (but not merely the substitution of a new trustee);

In the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

In the case of a general partner that is a corporation, the filing of a certificate of dissolution, or its equivalent, for the corporation or the revocation of its charter; or

In the case of an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate’s entire interest in the partnership.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Demand futility.—

Limited partners could satisfy the demand rule by pleading futility because subsequent to the withdrawal of the sole general partner, the partnership agreement required the limited partnership to dissolve, wind up, and then terminate; after the general partner’s death, therefore, the limited partnership entered dissolution without a general partner, making the limited partners’ effort to cause the general partner to bring the action unlikely to succeed. Fritchel v. White, 2019 WY 117, 452 P.3d 601,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2019).

Cited in

N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins.
Co., 2015 WY 150,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Nov. 24, 2015).

§ 17-14-503.
General powers and liabilities.

Except as provided in this act, in subsections (b) and (c) of this section or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

A person that becomes a general partner of an existing limited partnership is not personally liable for an obligation of a limited partnership incurred before the person became a partner.

An obligation of a limited partnership incurred while the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, is solely the obligation of the limited partnership. A general partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for such an obligation solely by reason of being or acting as a general partner of a limited liability limited partnership. This subsection applies despite anything inconsistent in the partnership agreement that existed immediately before the election by all the partners to become a limited liability limited partnership. For purposes of this section, the obligation of a limited partnership under contract is deemed to arise at the time the limited partnership entered into the contract.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 2007, ch. 38, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, designated the former provisions as (a) and added (b) and (c); and inserted “in subsections (b) and (c) of this section” in (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-14-202(a)(xvi).

Limited partner's duties. —

Limited partners did not owe another limited partner a fiduciary duty because (1) the limited partnership agreement imposed no such duty, (2) the common law imposed no such duty, and (3) Wyoming statutory law imposed no such duty, as provisions of the Wyoming Uniform Partnership Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

17-21-101

et seq., regarding fiduciary duties were not extended to limited partnerships. Wallop Canyon Ranch, LLC v. Goodwyn, 2015 WY 81, 351 P.3d 943,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2015).

§ 17-14-504.
Contributions by, and distributions to, general partner.

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in the distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of his participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-505.
Voting.

The partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified general partners the right to vote (on a per capita or any other basis), separately or with all or any class of the limited partners, on any matter.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.